Illinois, session 104th, SB2293.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 5amended by changing Section 10-65 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 100/10-65)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1010-65)7    Sec. 10-65. Licenses. 8    (a) When any licensing is required by law to be preceded by 9notice and an opportunity for a hearing, the provisions of 10this Act concerning contested cases shall apply. 11    (b) When a licensee has made timely and sufficient 12application for the renewal of a license or a new license with 13reference to any activity of a continuing nature, the existing 14license shall continue in full force and effect until the 15final agency decision on the application has been made unless 16a later date is fixed by order of a reviewing court. 17    (c) Except as provided in subsection (b-5) of Section 1-17 18of the Department of Natural Resources Act, an An application 19for a new license shall include the applicant's social 20security number, which shall be retained in the agency's 21records pertaining to the license. As soon as practical, an 22agency must assign a customer identification number to each 23applicant for a license that the applicant may use in place of   SB2293- 2 -LRB104 10919 BDA 21001 b1his or her social security number on the application for a 2license or renewal of a license. A licensee's social security 3number shall not appear on the face of his or her license. Each 4agency shall require the licensee to certify on the 5application form, under penalty of perjury, that he or she is 6not more than 30 days delinquent in complying with a child 7support order. Every application shall state that failure to 8so certify shall result in disciplinary action, and that 9making a false statement may subject the licensee to contempt 10of court. The agency shall notify each applicant or licensee 11who acknowledges a delinquency or who, contrary to his or her 12certification, is found to be delinquent or who after 13receiving notice, fails to comply with a subpoena or warrant 14relating to a paternity or a child support proceeding, that 15the agency intends to take disciplinary action. Accordingly, 16the agency shall provide written notice of the facts or 17conduct upon which the agency will rely to support its 18proposed action and the applicant or licensee shall be given 19an opportunity for a hearing in accordance with the provisions 20of the Act concerning contested cases. Any delinquency in 21complying with a child support order can be remedied by 22arranging for payment of past due and current support. Any 23failure to comply with a subpoena or warrant relating to a 24paternity or child support proceeding can be remedied by 25complying with the subpoena or warrant. Upon a final finding 26of delinquency or failure to comply with a subpoena or   SB2293- 3 -LRB104 10919 BDA 21001 b1warrant, the agency shall suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue 2or renew the license. In cases in which the Department of 3Healthcare and Family Services (formerly Department of Public 4Aid) has previously determined that an applicant or a licensee 5is more than 30 days delinquent in the payment of child support 6and has subsequently certified the delinquency to the 7licensing agency, and in cases in which a court has previously 8determined that an applicant or licensee has been in violation 9of the Non-Support Punishment Act for more than 60 days, the 10licensing agency shall refuse to issue or renew or shall 11revoke or suspend that person's license based solely upon the 12certification of delinquency made by the Department of 13Healthcare and Family Services (formerly Department of Public 14Aid) or the certification of violation made by the court. 15Further process, hearings, or redetermination of the 16delinquency or violation by the licensing agency shall not be 17required. The licensing agency may issue or renew a license if 18the licensee has arranged for payment of past and current 19child support obligations in a manner satisfactory to the 20Department of Healthcare and Family Services (formerly 21Department of Public Aid) or the court. The licensing agency 22may impose conditions, restrictions, or disciplinary action 23upon that license. 24    (d) Except as provided in subsection (c), no agency shall 25revoke, suspend, annul, withdraw, amend materially, or refuse 26to renew any valid license without first giving written notice   SB2293- 4 -LRB104 10919 BDA 21001 b1to the licensee of the facts or conduct upon which the agency 2will rely to support its proposed action and an opportunity 3for a hearing in accordance with the provisions of this Act 4concerning contested cases. At the hearing, the licensee shall 5have the right to show compliance with all lawful requirements 6for the retention, continuation, or renewal of the license. 7If, however, the agency finds that the public interest, 8safety, or welfare imperatively requires emergency action, and 9if the agency incorporates a finding to that effect in its 10order, summary suspension of a license may be ordered pending 11proceedings for revocation or other action. Those proceedings 12shall be promptly instituted and determined. 13    (e) Any application for renewal of a license that contains 14required and relevant information, data, material, or 15circumstances that were not contained in an application for 16the existing license shall be subject to the provisions of 17subsection (a). 18(Source: P.A. 96-328, eff. 8-11-09; 97-400, eff. 1-1-12.) 19    Section 10. The Department of Natural Resources Act is 20amended by changing Section 1-17 as follows: 21    (20 ILCS 801/1-17)22    Sec. 1-17. Licenses; privacy protection. 23    (a) For purposes of this Section, "license" means a 24license required under Article 3 of the Wildlife Code or under   SB2293- 5 -LRB104 10919 BDA 21001 b1Article 20 of the Fish and Aquatic Life Code.2    (b) As soon as practicable, the Department must assign a 3customer identification number to each applicant for a 4license. After the applicant has been assigned a customer 5identification number, the applicant may use that customer 6identification number in place of his or her social security 7number or passport number on any subsequent application for a 8license. The Department must keep a record of the social 9security number or passport number of each applicant. The 10Department shall notify the applicant that his or her social 11security number or passport number is kept on file with the 12Department.13    (b-5) The Department may accept a passport number in place 14of a social security number for a nonresident applicant 15applying for a license required under the Wildlife Code or the 16Fish and Aquatic Life Code if the nonresident applicant 17resides outside of the United States and is not a United States 18citizen. A person issued a license under this subsection (b-5) 19may not use that license to hunt on public land.20    (c) A licensee's social security number or passport number 21shall not appear on the face of his or her license.22    (d) The Department shall offer to each successful 23purchaser of a hunting license that was obtained by online 24purchase and issued pursuant to the Wildlife Code the 25opportunity to be redirected to the First Person Consent organ 26and tissue donor registry website maintained by the Secretary   SB2293- 6 -LRB104 10919 BDA 21001 b1of State under Section 6-117 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 2(Source: P.A. 102-950, eff. 1-1-23.)